Maryland, session 2025, SB0270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
35–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT ARRANGEMENT” MEANS A SUPPLEMENTAL
PLAN PROVISION THAT REQUIRES AN ELIGIBLE EMPLOYER TO DEDUCT ELECTIVE
DEFERRALS FROM AN EMPLOYEE’S WAGES FOR CONTRIBUTION TO A
SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN UNLESS THE EMPLOYEE MAKES AN ELECTION
NOT TO CONTRIBUTE OR TO CONTRIBUTE A DIFFERENT AMOUNT.
[(b)] (C) “Board” means the State Board of Trustees of the Maryland Teachers
and State Employees Supplemental Retirement Plans.
(D) “ELIGIBLE EMPLOYER” MEANS THE EMPLOYER OF AN INDIVIDUAL
ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN A SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN.
[(c)] (E) “Supplemental retirement plans” means the deferred compensation,
tax sheltered annuity, salary reduction savings plans, and any other plans authorized by
this title.
35–206.
(A) THE (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE BOARD SHALL IMPLEMENT AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT
ARRANGEMENT TO AUTOMATICALLY ENROLL ALL STATE EMPLOYEES HIRED ON OR
AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026, IN A SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN.
(2) AN EMPLOYING INSTITUTION, AS DEFINED IN § 30–101 OF THIS
ARTICLE, MAY AUTOMATICALLY ENROLL EMPLOYEES INTO THE SUPPLEMENTAL
RETIREMENT PLAN THAT THE EMPLOYING INSTITUTION CHOOSES.
(B) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AN ELIGIBLE
EMPLOYER SHALL DEDUCT AN AMOUNT FROM THE WAGES OF AN EMPLOYEE FOR
CONTRIBUTION TO A SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN AS PART OF AN
AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT ARRANGEMENT, UNLESS THE EMPLOYEE HAS ELECTED
TO WITHDRAW FROM THE SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN OR CEASE MAKING
CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN.

SENATE BILL 270 3
(2) THE AMOUNT DEDUCTED FROM THE WAGES OF AN EMPLOYEE
EACH PAY PERIOD SHALL BE THE MINIMUM AMOUNT SET BY THE BOARD, NOT TO
EXCEED $25, UNLESS THE EMPLOYEE ELECTS TO:
(I) HAVE A DIFFERENT AMOUNT DEDUCTED;
(II) CEASE MAKING CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE SUPPLEMENTAL
RETIREMENT PLAN; OR
(III) WITHDRAW FROM THE SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN.
(C) AN EMPLOYEE ENROLLED IN A SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN
UNDER AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT ARRANGEMENT SHALL BE:
(1) OFFERED A VIRTUAL OR IN–PERSON COUNSELING APPOINTMENT
TO DISCUSS THE SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN AND THE TIMELINE FOR
DISCONTINUING PARTICIPATION;
(2) PROVIDED A NOTICE WITH AN EXPLANATION OF:
(I) THE TERMS OF THE EMPLOYEE’S ENROLLMENT IN THE
SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN, INCLUDING THE CURRENT CONTRIBUTION
AMOUNT PROVIDED FOR UNDER THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT ARRANGEMENT;
(II) THE EMPLOYEE’S RIGHT TO INCREASE, DECREASE, OR
CEASE CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN;
(III) THE EMPLOYEE’S RIGHT TO DISCONTINUE PARTICIPATION
IN THE SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE FIRST
AUTOMATIC DEDUCTION OF THE EMPLOYEE’S CONTRIBUTION FROM WAGES;
(IV) THE EMPLOYEE’S RIGHT TO RECEIVE A REFUND OF THE
EMPLOYEE’S ACCOUNT CONTRIBUTIONS AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE AFTER
DISCONTINUING PARTICIPATION WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE FIRST AUTOMATIC
DEDUCTION OF THE EMPLOYEE’S CONTRIBUTION FROM WAGES; AND
(V) THE EMPLOYEE’S RIGHTS REGARDING THE INVESTMENT OF
THE EMPLOYEE’S ACCOUNT AND THE INVESTMENT OPTIONS AVAILABLE UNDER THE
SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN; AND
(VI) THE DEFAULT CONTRIBUTION AMOUNT ESTABLISHED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION THAT WILL BE IN EFFECT FOR THE
EMPLOYEE’S FIRST PAYROLL DEDUCTION; AND

SENATE BILL 270
(2) (3) TREATED AS EXERCISING CONTROL OF THE ASSETS IN THE
SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN ACCOUNT REGARDING THE AMOUNT OF
CONTRIBUTIONS AND EARNINGS.
(D) IF A PARTICIPANT IS ENROLLED IN A SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT
PLAN UNDER AN AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT ARRANGEMENT, THE BOARD SHALL
INVEST THE PARTICIPANT’S CONTRIBUTIONS IN A DESIGNATED DEFAULT
INVESTMENT OPTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH EACH APPLICABLE SUPPLEMENTAL
RETIREMENT PLAN.
(E) EACH UNIT THAT HIRES AN ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE WHO IS NOT ALREADY
ENROLLED IN A SUPPLEMENTAL RETIREMENT PLAN SHALL PROVIDE THE BOARD
WITH THE INFORMATION NECESSARY TO COMPLETE THE ENROLLMENT OF THE
EMPLOYEE UNDER THE AUTOMATIC ENROLLMENT ARRANGEMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply only to
individuals eligible to participate in a supplemental retirement plan who commence
employment or who are reinstated on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.